Washington statutes.
RCW 36.18.045

Treasurer's fees.

County treasurers shall collect the following fees for their official services:

For preparing and certifying copies, with or without seal for the first legal size page, two dollars, for each additional legal size page, one dollar.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.18.045. Prior: 1959 c 263 s 10.]